California statutes. Public Resources Code
A resource enhancement plan prepared for a project to be carried out directly by the conservancy as provided in Section 31263, shall, before any lands are acquired or other implementation actions taken, be submitted to the local public agency which exercises land use regulation over the area of the proposed project and to any state agency which exercises resource management responsibility in the project area. The local public agency and state agency shall have 90 days to review and comment on the proposed coastal resource enhancement project. If, during that period that local public agency, a nonprofit organization, or the state agency agrees to carry out the project within the guidelines established in the resource enhancement plan, the conservancy may authorize the local public agency, a nonprofit organization, or the state agency to carry out the project, which shall then be subject to all provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 17.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31265.

Prior to undertaking any resource enhancement project under the provisions of Section 31263, the project shall be included within, and funded under, the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31270.

Notwithstanding the geographic limitations of this division or Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000), the conservancy may undertake a coastal resource enhancement project in the City of San Diego, within the area known as Famosa Slough and bounded by West Point Loma Boulevard and the seaward side of the right-of-way of Famosa Boulevard and the seaward side of the right-of-way of Adrian Street.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Urban Waterfront Restoration [31300. - 31316.]

31300.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Urban Waterfront Restoration Act of 1981“.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31301.

The Legislature finds and declares that California’s urban waterfronts, being often the first part of an urban area to develop and, thus, the first to decay, are in need of restoration in order to be the vital economic and cultural component of the community which they once were. The Legislature further finds and declares that developing the state’s urban waterfronts into environmentally sound areas through, but not limited to, the creation of parks, open space, visitor serving facilities, and housing for all income levels will promote tourism, public access, and private sector development in these areas. The Legislature further finds and declares that the encouragement of tourism, public access to the coast, and planned private sector development to be a benefit to the citizens of the state, as well as the local citizenry in affected urban waterfront areas. It is, therefore, the intent of this chapter to promote the restoration of the state’s vital urban waterfronts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31302.

The conservancy shall administer the provisions of this chapter. The conservancy shall coordinate the activities of all other state agencies and all federal agencies that have programs affecting California’s urban waterfronts in order to increase the efficiency and minimize duplication of those programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31303.

The conservancy shall request the commission, public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and other public and private groups to assist in the development of criteria and guidelines for the submission, evaluation, and determination of priority of projects. After considering comments received from those sources and ensuring that adequate opportunity for public review and comment has been provided, the conservancy shall adopt guidelines and criteria for the administration of the urban waterfront restoration program authorized under this chapter.

In accordance with procedures adopted by the conservancy, public agencies and nonprofit organizations may submit proposed urban waterfront projects for consideration by the conservancy for state or federal funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31305.

In reviewing grant applications and urban waterfront restoration plans, the conservancy shall seek to promote excellence of design and shall stimulate projects which exhibit innovation in sensitively integrating man-made features into the natural coastal environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31306.

(a) The conservancy shall propose capital projects and capital programs, generated by the conservancy, local public agencies, or state agencies for grants available under Section 306A of the federal Coastal Zone Management Improvement Act (Public Law 96-464). The commission shall not forward any application unless it has been proposed by the conservancy.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall diminish the commission’s authority pursuant to Section 30330 of the Public Resources Code, which shall include determination of the allocation of federal financial assistance among the coastal management activities, coastal research activities, coastal energy impact activities, living marine resource activities, and natural resources enhancement and management activities, eligible for federal financial assistance under the Coastal Zone Management Improvement Act, or any amendment thereto, or any other federal act enacted up to this time or in the future, that relates to the planning and management of the coastal zone, except as provided in this section.

(c) (1) Prior to the commission’s determination of allocations under subdivision (b), the commission and the conservancy shall concur on the allocation for capital projects and capital programs generated by the conservancy, local public agencies, or state agencies for public access, agricultural preservation, enhancement of coastal resources, coastal restoration, urban waterfront restoration, reservation of significant coastal resource areas, and commercial fishing facilities. No allocation for these capital projects and capital programs shall be made unless they are proposed by the conservancy.

(2) Prior to the commission’s determination of allocations under subdivision (b), the commission and the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission shall concur on the allocation for the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission to carry out its responsibilities under the federally approved California Coastal Management Program.

(3) In determining the allocations under subdivision (b), the commission shall consult with the conservancy, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, and the Department of Finance, and shall ensure that agencies eligible for federal financial assistance under the Coastal Zone Management Improvement Act are allocated sufficient assistance to carry out their required responsibilities under the federally approved California Coastal Management Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 225, Sec. 60.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

31307.

The conservancy may award grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the restoration of urban coastal waterfront areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31308.

The conservancy may provide up to the total cost of any urban waterfront project, including the local share of federally supported projects. The conservancy may also require local funding participation in urban waterfront projects. The amount of funding provided by the conservancy and the degree of local participation shall be determined by the total amount of funding available for urban waterfront projects, the fiscal resources of the applicant, the urgency of the project relative to other eligible urban waterfront projects, the degree to which the project meets the objectives set forth in Section 31305, and the application of other factors prescribed by the conservancy for the purpose of determining project eligibility and priority in order to more effectively carry out the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31309.

(a) Following approval of a proposed urban waterfront project by the conservancy, the conservancy may provide up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of the cost of preparing urban waterfront restoration plans. In addition, the conservancy may make loans to public agencies or nonprofit organizations, or any combination thereof, for the full cost of preparing an urban waterfront restoration plan, if both of the following are satisfied:

(1) Funding for those loans is provided for in the Budget Act.

(2) The cost of preparation of a plan is included in the cost of a project approved for funding pursuant to Division 22 (commencing with Section 32000).

(b) The loans shall be repaid when the bonds funding the project are sold and upon terms and at a rate of interest which recovers the costs of the funds to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 280, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

31310.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may enter into an option to acquire an interest in real property in connection with an urban waterfront project, when the Legislature appropriates funds for purposes of carrying out the objectives of this division. The cost of the option may not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31311.

Costs of providing parks, open space, or other public areas and facilities may be included as project costs within urban waterfront restoration areas, if they are designed to serve the residents of the restoration area and do not constitute a disproportionate share of the total project cost. Costs of providing public coastal access sites and scenic easements serving the public may be permitted as project costs where such features are part of an approved urban waterfront restoration plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31311.5.

Where the conservancy awards any grant for the purpose of providing new or expanded facilities to serve the commercial fishing industry, the financial terms and any reimbursement provisions of that grant shall be determined solely on the basis of protecting the long-term economic viability of the commercial fishing industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1618, Sec. 5.   Note: Supersedes repeal by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1617.)
-------------------------------------------

31312.

Local public agencies and nonprofit organizations, in undertaking urban waterfront restoration projects as provided in this chapter, shall be subject to the provisions of Division 24 (commencing with Section 33000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31313.

Any funds over and above eligible project costs which remain after completion of an urban waterfront project as provided in this chapter shall be transmitted by the recipient to the state and deposited with the conservancy and shall be available for expenditure when appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the programs specified in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31314.

Plans prepared pursuant to this chapter for the Port of San Francisco may seek to expedite the implementation of visitor serving commercial uses of port property not needed for maritime use, establish a system of open spaces and public access along the waterfront, provide for commercial fishing facilities, and provide for the rehabilitation of existing deteriorated wharfs and piers.

Upon the approval of the State Coastal Conservancy, funding of the Port of San Francisco pursuant to this chapter shall be given high priority and be available to implement plans prepared pursuant to this chapter and to increase the port’s ability to establish an ongoing land management program to encourage public access and tourist uses of the port.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1410, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31315.

The conservancy, under its mandate for urban waterfront restoration, shall administer the distribution of state funds, when appropriated to the conservancy, for the improvement of the infrastructure of fishing harbors on public trust lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1279, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31316.

Within the conservancy’s jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter and within urban coastal watershed areas, the conservancy may undertake projects and award grants for activities that are compatible with the preservation, restoration, or enhancement of ocean, coastal, or watershed resources, or that facilitate environmental education related to these resources. These projects or activities may include, but are not limited to, exhibits or events emphasizing coastal, watershed, or ocean resource education, or maritime history, or the development of amenities and infrastructure consistent with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 383, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Reservation of Significant Coastal Resource Areas [31350. - 31356.]

31350.

It is the policy of the Legislature to assure that significant coastal resource sites shall be reserved for public use and enjoyment. To achieve this objective, it is the intent of the Legislature to vest in the conservancy authority to acquire, hold, protect, and use interests in key coastal resource lands, as indicated in the chapters of this division, that otherwise would be lost to public use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31351.

(a) The conservancy shall cooperate with the commission, bay commission, and other public agencies and with nonprofit organizations in ensuring the reservation of interests in real property for purposes of this division, as well as for park, recreation, fish and wildlife habitat, historical preservation, or scientific study required to meet the policies and objectives of the California Coastal Act of 1976 (commencing with Section 30000), or a certified local coastal plan or program; or, in the case of San Francisco Bay, the sites identified in the bay plan, the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan, or in any other local plan that the bay commission determines to be consistent with those plans; or, in coastal areas not within the coastal zone or the San Francisco Bay, any other local plans.

(b) The provisions of this division shall not diminish or otherwise affect the authority of the bay commission to approve, deny, or modify permits as provided in Section 66632 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31352.

(a) If a public agency or nonprofit organization is unable, due to limited financial resources or other circumstances, to acquire, hold, protect, or use an interest in real property for a purpose provided in Section 31351, the conservancy may do either of the following:

(1) Award a grant to the public agency or nonprofit organization for a purpose provided in Section 31351.

(2) Acquire and hold the interest for subsequent conveyance to an appropriate public agency or nonprofit organization.

(b) The conservancy may provide the technical assistance required to aid a public agency or nonprofit organization in completing the acquisition or related functions described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31352.5.

Where a nonprofit organization is better situated than the conservancy to acquire temporarily an interest in real property for later acquisition by a public agency or nonprofit organization, the conservancy may loan the nonprofit organization the necessary funds to accomplish the acquisition. As a condition of that loan, the nonprofit organization shall adhere to the procedures and restrictions of this chapter in accomplishing the acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31353.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may enter into an option to acquire an interest in real property in connection with a site-reservation project, when the Legislature appropriates funds for purposes of carrying out the objectives of this division. The cost of the option may not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31354.

The conservancy may not hold fee interests acquired in accordance with this chapter for more than 10 years from the time of acquisition. A public agency shall have the right to acquire the fee interest at any time during this period for the public purposes indicated in this chapter. At any time during this period, a nonprofit organization may acquire the fee interest if the city or county where the lands are located approves the acquisition. The acquisition shall be deemed approved thirty days after the conservancy has mailed written notice, unless the city or county objects in writing within that time. When deemed appropriate by the conservancy, the instrument conveying an interest in real property to a nonprofit organization may include a restriction permanently limiting the use of those lands to the acquisition purposes. The price to public agencies or to nonprofit organizations that acquire interests in real property from the conservancy may include the cost of acquisition or the conservancy’s administrative and management costs in reserving and managing the land, or both. The payment of this acquisition price shall be either monetary or conservancy approved property of an equivalent value, or a combination thereof. The lands acquired under this section shall not be disposed of under Section 11011.1 of the Government Code. If, at the expiration of this 10-year period, no public agency or nonprofit organization is willing or able to acquire the lands, the conservancy shall request the Department of General Services to dispose of those lands at fair market value without restriction on subsequent land use under this division.

Any funds received by the state upon disposition of lands acquired in accordance with Section 31352 shall be deposited with the conservancy and shall be available for expenditure when appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the programs specified in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31355.

The conservancy is authorized to lease interest in real property acquired in accordance with this chapter. When the leases are made to private individuals or groups, the conservancy shall annually, upon appropriation of the amounts by the Legislature, transfer 24 percent of the gross income of the leases to the county where the interests in real property are situated.

The county shall distribute any payment received by it pursuant to this section to itself, to each revenue district for which the county assesses and collects real property taxes or assessments, and to every other taxing agency within the county where the property is situated. The amount distributable to the county and each revenue district or other taxing agency shall be proportionate to the ratio that the amount of the taxes and assessments of each on similar real property similarly situated within that part of the county embracing the smallest in area of the revenue districts or other taxing agencies other than the county, levied for the fiscal year next preceding, bears to the combined amount of the taxes and assessments of all those districts and agencies, including the county, on the property levied for that year. The county auditor shall determine and certify the amounts distributable to the board of supervisors, that shall thereupon order the making of the distribution.

Any money distributed pursuant to this section to any county, revenue district, or other taxing agency shall be deposited to the credit of the same fund as any taxes or assessments on any taxable similar real property similarly situated. 

Where a county receives a payment pursuant to this section in an amount of twenty-five dollars ($25) or less in respect to any parcel of leased property, all of that payment shall be distributed to the county for deposit in the county general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31356.

All remaining revenue derived from leases, after allocation to counties as specified in Section 31355, shall be deposited annually with the conservancy and shall be available for expenditure when appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the programs specified in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. System of Public Accessways [31400. - 31410.]

31400.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of the state that the right of the public to access and enjoyment of the coastal resources should be effectively guaranteed. To achieve such objective, it is the intent of the Legislature that the State Coastal Conservancy have a principal role in the implementation of a system of public accessways to and along the state’s coastline, including San Francisco Bay and Suisun Marsh.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

31400.1.

The conservancy may award grants to any public agency or nonprofit organization to acquire land, or any interest therein, or to develop, operate, or manage lands for public access purposes to and along the coast. No grants may be awarded to any local agency unless the conservancy has first determined that the subject accessway will serve more than local public needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 885, Sec. 3.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

31400.2.

The conservancy may provide up to the total cost of the acquisition of interests in lands and the initial development of public accessways by any public agency or nonprofit organization, as provided in Section 31400.1. The amount of funding provided by the conservancy shall be determined by the total amount of funding available for coastal public accessway projects, the fiscal resources of the applicant, the urgency of the project relative to other eligible projects, and the application of factors prescribed by the conservancy for the purpose of determining project eligibility and priority in order to more effectively carry out the provisions of the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1123, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

31400.3.

The conservancy may provide such assistance as is required to aid public agencies and nonprofit organizations in establishing a system of public coastal accessways, and related functions necessary to meet the objectives of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1234, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1234.)
-------------------------------------------

31401.

The conservancy shall develop and adopt standards to guide state and local public agencies and federal agencies to the extent permitted by federal law or regulations or the United States Constitution in acquiring and developing public access to coastal resources. Such standards shall be incorporated within an integrated system of public accessways to and along the state’s coastline which shall become an element of the California Outdoor Recreation Resources Plan required by Section 5099.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 840.)
-------------------------------------------

31402.

In order to assure that an adequate system of public accessways is provided along the entire coastline, the department or the conservancy may acquire fee title or lesser interests in areas required for public access to significant coastal resources. The department may develop and maintain such areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

31402.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for timely acceptance of offers to dedicate interests in property, recorded pursuant to Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) and needed to provide public access to and along the ocean shoreline.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) In order to prevent the potential loss of public accessways to and along the state’s coastline, it is in the best interest of the state to accept all offers to dedicate real property that protect open space or have the potential to provide access to public tidelands, including any beach, shoreline, or view area, or that provide a connection to other easements or public properties providing this access.

(2) Offers to dedicate interests in property that are required and recorded pursuant to Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) provide mitigation necessary for approved development to occur consistent with the policies and objectives of that division and are not gifts to the state or acquisitions of property interests within the meaning of Section 31105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 518, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31402.2.

The conservancy shall accept any outstanding offer to dedicate a public accessway, described in Section 31402.1, that has not been accepted by another public agency or nonprofit organization within 90 days of its expiration date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 337, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

31402.3.

(a) To the extent that funds are available in the Coastal Access Account in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund, the conservancy shall open at least three public accessways each year either directly or by awarding grants to public agencies or nonprofit organizations.

(b) The conservancy may transfer public access easements or other less-than-fee interests in property to an appropriate public agency or nonprofit organization for development, management, or public use, or may enter into agreements with public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the development, management, or public use of the accessway. Transfer under this section is not subject to approval by the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 11005.2 of the Government Code. The conservancy shall retain the right to reclaim the easements or other interests in the event that the public agency or nonprofit organization ceases to exist, is no longer able to manage the accessway, or violates the terms of the agreement.

(c) Before a nonprofit organization may accept an offer to dedicate an interest in real property under Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000), the nonprofit organization shall do all of the following:

(1) Submit satisfactory proof to the executive director of the commission that the nonprofit organization has been approved as a tax exempt public benefit corporation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and has filed a Form 990 with the Internal Revenue Service.

(2) Submit a management plan to the executive director of the commission and the executive officer of the conservancy that describes the nonprofit organization’s planned management and operation of the interest.

(3) Grant a right of entry that permits the conservancy to reclaim or assign the interest to another public agency or nonprofit organization, if the conservancy and the commission determine that the nonprofit organization is not managing or operating the interest consistent with the management plan developed pursuant to paragraph (2).

(d) A public accessway accepted pursuant to Section 31402.2 may not be developed, improved, or formally opened for public use until its transfer, development, or public use has been authorized by the conservancy.

(e) The conservancy may not use moneys appropriated from the General Fund for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 337, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

31403.

The department or the conservancy may not acquire any public access site under the power of eminent domain unless such acquisition is approved by the Legislature as part of its annual approval of the Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

31404.

When another local public agency is unable or unwilling to take title to an area required for public access to and along the coastline, the department or the conservancy may accept title to such an area. The department or the conservancy, however, shall not be required to open any area for public use when, in its estimation, the benefits of public use would be outweighed by the costs of development and maintenance. The department or the conservancy shall make a determined effort to identify local public agencies and nonprofit organizations which will accept responsibility for maintenance and liability for public accessways which are located outside of the state park system. The department or the conservancy may lease any public access site to a public agency or nonprofit organization; provided, however, that the conditions of such transfer guarantee public use of the site for access to coastal resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 667, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

31405.

The department or the conservancy may accept, from any public agency or nonprofit organization, fees collected for purposes of providing public access to coastal resources. Any funds collected from such source shall be expended by the department or the conservancy for the sole purpose of acquisition, development, and maintenance of public accessways to the coastline. To the maximum extent possible, such fees shall be expended in the general area where they are collected or in areas where public access to and along the coastline is clearly deficient. The department or the conservancy may transfer funds, including such fees, to a local public agency or nonprofit organization for the purposes of acquisition of sites for public access to and along the coastline.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 667, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

31406.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may enter into an option to acquire an interest in real property in connection with a public access project, when the Legislature appropriates funds for purposes of carrying out the objectives of this division. The cost of the option may not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31408.

(a) The conservancy shall, in consultation with the Department of Parks and Recreation, the California Coastal Commission, and the Department of Transportation, coordinate the development of the California Coastal Trail.

(b) To the extent feasible, and consistent with their individual mandates, each agency, board, department, or commission of the state with property interests or regulatory authority in coastal areas shall cooperate with the conservancy with respect to planning and making lands available for completion of the trail, including constructing trail links, placing signs, and managing the trail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 190.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

31409.

Consistent with the conservancy’s authority under this chapter to develop a system of public accessways to, and along, the state’s coastline, the conservancy may award grants and provide assistance to public agencies and nonprofit organizations to establish and expand those inland trail systems that may be linked to the California Coastal Trail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 446, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

31410.

(a) That portion of the Ma-le’l Dunes in Humboldt County that is part of the California Coastal Trail and is under the jurisdiction of the conservancy is hereby designated and shall be known as the Senator Wesley Chesbro Coastal Trail.

(b) After the date on which Wesley Chesbro ceases his service in the Legislature or on January 1, 2009, whichever occurs later, the conservancy shall erect appropriate signage, upon receipt of funding as described in subdivision (c), to reflect the designation made by this section and shall cause all directories and other publications concerning the California Coastal Trail to reflect the designation as the publications are periodically revised.

(c) The costs of the signage shall be funded by parties who request the conservancy to erect that signage pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 548, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Lower Cost Coastal Accommodations Program [31411. - 31414.]

31411.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The right of access to the coast is guaranteed to the people of California by the California Constitution and the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000)), which requires that coastal development be regulated, and public access rights to our state’s beaches be protected.

(b) California’s Parks Forward Commission has emphasized the need to expand access to parks and public lands throughout California to ensure that all Californians and visitors to the state, including those from low-income and underserved communities, are able
 to benefit from outdoor experiences.

(c) Lower cost accommodations, including hotels, motels, hostels, cabins, and camping opportunities, are essential elements of coastal and park access because they enable Californians and visitors from a variety of backgrounds, including those of low and moderate income, to enjoy California’s beaches and parks and experience the full range of recreational, educational, spiritual, and other experiences offered.

(d) A lack of affordable accommodations remains a barrier to coastal access. California’s historic supply of lower cost coastal accommodations has been reduced, and continues to be diminished, as a result of high coastal property values and economic pressures to develop new coastal accommodations that are too expensive to be affordable to most
 visitors.

(e) California should invest in new strategies and partnerships to improve the availability of lower cost accommodations along the coast, particularly for low-income and middle-income families. A strategic program to provide affordable accommodations in appropriate areas of our coastal parks and public lands can play an important role in improving public access to the coast. California should also support innovative pilot projects that enable the state to partner with nonprofit organizations and the private sector in order to provide coastal access.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

31412.

(a) The conservancy shall develop and implement a Lower Cost Coastal Accommodations Program to facilitate improvement of existing, and the development of new, lower cost accommodations within one and one-half miles of the coast. In implementing the program, the conservancy may undertake projects and award grants, and shall be guided by the lower cost accommodations assessment required to be developed pursuant to Section 31413.

(b) The program shall include both of the following:

(1) Clear and measurable objectives.

(2) Implementation measures
 designed to ensure that new or improved accommodation projects supported by the program will be affordable and available to low-income and middle-income families and to nonprofit organizations and public entities that provide young or at-risk populations with education, service learning, healthy living, recreational, or similar opportunities.

(c) The conservancy shall take all of the following actions to develop and implement the program:

(1) Consult with the Department of Parks and Recreation, the California Coastal Commission, local and regional park agencies, open-space districts, and other public agencies regarding development of the accommodations assessment and selection and funding of specific projects to improve existing and new lower cost coastal accommodations.

(2) Engage with parks, conservation, and community groups to ensure that program activities reflect and address community needs and interests.

(3) Provide the department, commission, and other interested agencies and organizations with copies of the completed assessment, as well as technical assistance upon request, for purposes of informing their potential investments in lower cost accommodations along the coast.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

31413.

(a) The conservancy shall prepare a lower cost coastal accommodations assessment that includes, at a minimum, all of the following elements:

(1) (A) A description of specific opportunities to improve existing and develop new lower cost accommodations on coastal public lands and coastal lands owned or operated by nonprofit organizations, including a list of potentially suitable sites for the location of these accommodations.

(B) For purposes of the description required by this paragraph, all of the following shall apply:

(i) Lands may include, but are not limited to, state, regional, and local parks, lands held by harbor or open space districts, lands owned by the public but not yet designated as parks, lands owned by nonprofit organizations, and national parks and other federally managed lands.

(ii) Qualifying accommodations may include, but are not limited to, campgrounds, cabins, and hostels.

(iii) A site for potential lower cost accommodations shall not be included in the assessment without consultation from the agency or nonprofit organization that owns or operates the site. A site shall not be included in the assessment if so requested by the entity that owns or operates the site.

(2) An analysis of daily occupancy or